California, session 20252026, AB1215.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2282 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2282. The regular practice of medicine in a licensed general or specialized hospital having five or more physicians and surgeons on the medical staff, which does not have rules established by the board of directors thereof to govern the operation of the hospital, which rules include, among other provisions, all the following, constitutes unprofessional conduct:(a) Provision for the organization of physicians and surgeons surgeons, dentists, podiatrists, clinical psychologists, nurse practitioners, nurse anesthetists, nurse midwives, and other health care professionals licensed to practice in this state who are permitted to practice in the hospital into a formal medical staff with appropriate officers and bylaws and with staff appointments on an annual or biennial basis.(b) Provision that membership on the medical staff shall be restricted to physicians and surgeons surgeons, dentists, podiatrists, clinical psychologists, nurse practitioners, nurse anesthetists, nurse midwives, and other licensed practitioners competent in their respective fields and worthy in professional ethics. In this respect the division of profits from professional fees in any manner shall be prohibited and any such division shall be cause for exclusion from the staff.(c) Provision that the medical staff shall be self-governing with respect to the professional work performed in the hospital; that the medical staff shall meet periodically and review and analyze at regular intervals their clinical experience; and the medical records of patients shall be the basis for such review and analysis.(d) Provision that adequate and accurate medical records be prepared and maintained for all patients.SEC. 2. Section 2283 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2283. The regular practice of medicine in a licensed general or specialized hospital having less than five physicians and surgeons on the medical staff, which does not have rules established by the board of directors thereof to govern the operation of the hospital, which rules include, among other provisions, all of the following, constitutes unprofessional conduct:(a) Provision that membership on the medical staff shall be restricted to physicians and surgeons surgeons, dentists, podiatrists, clinical psychologists, nurse practitioners, nurse anesthetists, nurse midwives, and other licensed practitioners competent in their respective fields and worthy in professional ethics. In this respect the division of profits for professional fees in any manner shall be prohibited and any such division shall be cause for exclusion from the staff.(b) Provision that adequate and accurate medical records be prepared and maintained for all patients.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.